Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4046.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 11d. The portion of highway US-31 in Grand Traverse County between Three Mile Road and Bunker Hill Road shall be known as the Trooper James E. Boland Memorial Highway. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor